test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_vuollad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - vuollâđ: # 
    vuollâđ+V+Inf: vuollâđ
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: vuolâm
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: vuolah
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: vuálá
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: vyelleen
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: vuolâvettee
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: vuollâv
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: vuollâp
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: vuolâvetteđ
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: vyelih
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: vuollim
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: vuollih
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: vuolâi
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: vuoláim
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: vuoláid
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: vuoláin
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: vuolâim
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: vuolâid
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: vuollii
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: vuolâččim
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: vuolâččih
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: vuolâččij
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: vuolâččáim
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: vuolâččáid
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: vuolâččáin
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: vuolâččijm
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: vuolâččijd
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: vuolâččii
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: vyeleem
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: vyeleeh
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: vuolâš
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: vuolâžeen
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: vuolâšvettee
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: vuolâžává
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: vuolâžep
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: vuolâšvetteđ
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: vuolâžeh

    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: vuolâ
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: vuálus
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: vuálloon
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: vyellee
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: vuállus
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: vuállup
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: vuollâđ
    vuollâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: vuállus
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: vuolâ
    vuollâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: vuollâm
    vuollâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: vuolâččii
    vuollâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: vuolii
    vuollâđ+V+PrsPrc: vyellee
    vuollâđ+V+PrfPrc: vuollâm
    vuollâđ+V+Actio+Nom: vuollâm
    vuollâđ+V+Actio+Ess: vuolâmin
    vuollâđ+V+Actio+Loc: vuolâmist
    vuollâđ+V+Actio+Ill: vuolâmân
    vuollâđ+V+Actio+Com: vuolâdijn
    vuollâđ+V+VAbess: vuolâhánnáá
